District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4801

Definition and penalty.

Repealed.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 501(a), 42 DCR 53

History

This section is referenced in § 11-502, § 22-4001, § 24-251.02, and § 24-403.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 22-2801.

Prior Codifications

Former § 22-2801 1981 Ed. had also been amended by § 2(r) of D.C. Law 10-119.

Editor's Notes